Maryland, session 2025, SB0674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Commission for Women in the Department of Human Services
shall establish the Maryland Collaborative to Advance Implementation of Coverage of
Over–the–Counter Birth Control.
(b) The Collaborative consists of the following members:
– 1 –

Ch. 293 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) one representative of the Maryland Insurance Administration,
designated by the Commissioner of the Maryland Insurance Administration;
(2) two representatives of the Maryland Department of Health, designated
by the Secretary of Health, of whom:
(i) one shall be a representative of the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program; and
(ii) one shall be a representative of public health;
(3) one representative of the Department of Budget and Management with
expertise in the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program,
designated by the Secretary of Budget and Management;
(4) one representative of the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Human Services:
(i) one representative of Ibis Reproductive Health;
(ii) one representative of the National Health Law Program;
(iii) one representative of the American Society for Emergency
Contraception;
(iv) two representatives of Maryland–based reproductive justice
organizations;
(v) one representative of Advocates for Youth;
(vi) one representative of the Maryland Retailers Alliance;
(vii) one representative of the Maryland Association of Chain Drug
Stores;
(viii) one representative of the Independent Pharmacies of Maryland;
(ix) one representative of the Maryland Pharmacist Association;
(x) one representative of the League of Life and Health Insurers of
Maryland;
(xi) one representative of a pharmacy benefits manager;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 293
(xii) one representative of the Maryland Managed Care Organization
Association;
(xiii) one representative of a public higher education institution that
provides student health insurance; and
(xiv) one representative of the Consumer Health Information Hub at
the University of Maryland School of Public Health.
(c) The chair of the Maryland Commission for Women shall designate the chair
of the Collaborative.
(d) The Maryland Commission for Women shall provide staff for the
Collaborative.
(e) A member of the Collaborative:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Collaborative; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The purpose of the Collaborative is to study and make recommendations to
advance access to over–the–counter birth control through:
(1) implementation of State coverage requirements for over–the–counter
birth control at pharmacies;
(2) advancement of point–of–sale coverage options at retail counters,
virtual retail platforms, and vending machines;
(3) identification of public health initiatives to increase access to
over–the–counter birth control for individuals who:
(i) do not have over–the–counter birth control coverage; or
(ii) cannot access over–the–counter birth control coverage; and
(4) enhancement of education and engagement of consumers, health care
practitioners, public health and community programs, and health care industry
stakeholders.
(g) The Collaborative shall:
(1) study:
– 3 –

Ch. 293 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) responses to the request for information on over–the–counter
coverage of preventive services published on October 4, 2023, from the U.S. Department of
Labor, the U.S. Department of the Treasury, and the U.S. Department of Health and
Human Services;
(ii) responses to the proposed rule on over–the–counter coverage
issued by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services on October 21, 2024;
(iii) the report developed in consultation with policy experts in states
with over–the–counter coverage laws and published by Ibis Reproductive Health on
November 4, 2024, titled “Free the Pill and Cover it Too: Strategies for Making OTC
Coverage Work in the Real World”; and
(iv) other reports and materials on implementing coverage for
over–the–counter birth control; and
(2) make recommendations on its findings.
(h) The Collaborative may consult with:
(1) health professional associations and other organizations with expertise
in advancing equitable access to birth control for all communities;
(2) retailers, independent and chain pharmacies, pharmacists, online retail
platforms, wellness vending machine companies, and any other entity involved in providing
over–the–counter contraception;
(3) insurers, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefits managers,
entities that administer cards for health savings accounts or flexible spending accounts,
and any other organizations involved in administering coverage of over–the–counter
contraception; and
(4) community health centers, local health departments, and
community–based organizations that support communities that have historically not been
engaged with the health care system.
(i) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the Collaborative shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before December 1, 2027, the Collaborative shall submit a final
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 293
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –